Wyoming, session 2025, HB0196.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-24-319(a)(iii) is amended to read:

22-24-319. Ballot proposition; when placed on ballot.

(a) The ballot proposition for an initiative shall be
placed on the election ballot of the first statewide
general election that is held after:

HB0196

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0695
(iii) A period of one hundred twenty (120) days
has expired since the adjournment of the legislative
session. If the attorney general determines that an act of
the legislature enacted after the petition is filed is
substantially the same as the proposed law, the petition
shall be void and the ballot proposition shall not be
placed on the election ballot, and the secretary of state
shall so notify the committee of applicants.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0196